ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > 斧関連用品: 斧柄; 斧頭
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Fejszekiegészítők: Fejszefogantyúk; Fejszefejek
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Tilbehør til økser: Øksehåndtag; Øksehoveder
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 斧子配件: 斧柄; 斧头
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per asce: Manici per asce; Teste per asce
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для топоров: Топорища; Обухи для топоров
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Kirvestarvikkeet: Kirveen varret; Kirveen päät
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Bijlaccessoires: Bijlstelen; Bijlbladen
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện rìu: Cán rìu; Lưỡi rìu
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Axtzubehör: Axtgriffe; Axtköpfe
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ τσεκουριών: Χειρολαβές τσεκουριών; Κεφαλές τσεκουριών
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Yxtillbehör: Yxskaft; Yxhuvuden
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 斧用配件: 斧頭握把; 斧頭主部位
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do siekier: Rękojeści siekier; Głowice siekier
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за брадва: Дръжки за брадва; Глави за брадва
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para hachas: Mangos para hachas; Cabezas para hachas
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství k sekerám: Topůrka seker; Hlavy seker
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Balta Aksesuarları: Balta Sapları; Balta Kafaları
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo pre sekery: Rúčky na sekery; Sekerové hlavy
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Axe Accessories: Axe Handles; Axe Heads
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru topoare: Mânere pentru topoare; Lame pentru topoare
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 도끼 부대용품: 도끼 손잡이; 도끼 헤드
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์ขวาน: ด้ามจับขวาน; หัวขวาน
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour haches: Manches de hache; Têtes de haches
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de machado: Cabos de machado; Cabeças de machado
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para machado: Cabos para machado; Lâminas para machado
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Dodaci za sjekire: Ručke za sjekire; Glave za sjekire
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør for økser: Øksehåndtak; Øksehoder
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za sekire: Ročaji za sekire; Glave za sekire
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Kirvių priedai: Kirvių rankenos; Kirvių galvos